Tennessee statutes. Title 38 Prevention And Detection Of Crime
Chapter 9

Civil Emergencies

38-9-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Chief administrative officer” means the mayor of any municipality incorporated under the general law pursuant to title 6, chapter 1, part 2, or of any metropolitan government as chartered pursuant to title 7, chapter 1; and the city manager of any municipality incorporated pursuant to title 6, chapter 18, or of any municipality incorporated pursuant to title 6, chapter 30. In the case of other municipalities the chief administrative officer shall be the city manager or if there be none, the mayor. Any municipality, however, may by ordinance, specially designate any official as chief administrative officer for purposes of this chapter;

“Civil emergency” means:

A riot or unlawful assembly characterized by the use of actual force or violence or a threat to use force, if accompanied by the immediate power to execute, by three (3) or more persons acting together without authority of law;

Any natural disaster or man-made calamity, including, but not limited to, flood, conflagration, cyclone, tornado, earthquake or explosion within the geographic limits of a municipality resulting in the death or injury of persons, or the destruction of property to such an extent that extraordinary measures must be taken to protect the public health, safety and welfare; and

The destruction of property, or the death or injury of persons brought about by the deliberate acts of one (1) or more persons acting either alone or in concert with others, when such acts are a threat to the peace of the general public or any segment of the general public;

“Curfew” means a prohibition against any person or persons walking, running, loitering, standing or motoring upon any alley, street, highway, public property or vacant premises within the corporate limits of the municipality, except persons officially designated to duty with reference to the civil emergency, or those lawfully on the streets as defined in this chapter; and

“Substitute officer” means an official who shall act in the absence or inability to act of the chief administrative officer as provided in this chapter. Each municipality shall by ordinance designate a “substitute officer” for the purpose of this chapter.

Acts 1968, ch. 485, § 1; 1971, ch. 57, § 1; T.C.A., § 38-901.

Cross-References. Peace officers for the office of homeland security, § 38-3-114.

Registration of persons acting as law enforcement officers, § 8-8-221.

38-9-102. Proclamation of civil emergency.

When, in the judgment of the chief administrative officer of a municipality, a civil emergency as defined in this chapter is determined to exist, the officer shall immediately proclaim in writing the existence of the civil emergency, a copy of which proclamation will be filed with the clerk of the municipality, or if there is none, with the recorder.

Acts 1968, ch. 485, § 2; T.C.A., § 38-902.

38-9-103. General curfew.

After proclamation of a civil emergency by the chief administrative officer, the officer may order a general curfew applicable to the geographical areas of the municipality or to the municipality as a whole, as the officer deems advisable, and applicable during those hours of the day or night the officer deems necessary in the interest of the public safety and welfare. The proclamation and general curfew shall have the force and effect of law and shall continue in effect until rescinded in writing by the chief administrative officer, but not to exceed fifteen (15) days.

Acts 1968, ch. 485, § 3; T.C.A., § 38-903.

Collateral References.

Validity, construction, and application of loitering statutes and ordinances. 72 A.L.R.5th 1.

38-9-104. Restrictive orders.

After proclamation of a civil emergency, the chief administrative officer may, at the officer's discretion, in the interest of public safety and welfare:

Order the closing of all retail liquor stores;

Order the closing of all establishments where beer or alcoholic beverages are served;

Order the closing of all private clubs or portions of private clubs where the consumption of intoxicating liquor or beer is permitted;

Order the discontinuance of the sale of beer;

Order the discontinuance of selling, distribution, or giving away of gasoline or other liquid flammable or combustible products in any container other than a gasoline tank properly affixed to a motor vehicle;

Order the closing of gasoline stations, and other establishments, the chief activity of which is the sale, distribution or dispensing of liquid flammable or combustible products;

Order the discontinuance of selling, distributing, dispensing or giving away any firearms or ammunition of any character whatsoever;

Order the closing of any or all establishments or portions of establishments, the chief activity of which is the sale, distribution, dispensing or giving away of firearms or ammunition; and

Issue such other orders as are necessary for the protection of life and property.

Acts 1968, ch. 485, § 4; T.C.A., § 38-904.

38-9-105. Violations — Penalty.

Municipalities may provide by ordinance that any person violating the provisions of orders issued by the chief administrative officer pursuant to this authorization during a proclaimed civil emergency commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1968, ch. 485, § 5; T.C.A., § 38-905.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

38-9-106. Exceptions to curfew.

Any curfew as defined in this chapter shall not apply to persons lawfully on the streets and public places during a civil emergency who have obtained permission of the local chief of police or other law enforcement officer then in charge of municipal law enforcement, which permission shall be granted on good cause shown. This curfew also shall not apply to medical personnel in the performance of their duties.

Acts 1968, ch. 485, § 6; T.C.A., § 38-906.